Washington statutes.
RCW 43.166.050

State lands development authority operating account.

The state lands development authority operating account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for operating expenses under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 259 s 5.]